Nebraska, session 109, LB712.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB712 LB712
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-4008, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4008 (1)(a) A tax is hereby imposed upon the first owner of
tobacco products to be sold in this state.
(b) The tax on snuff shall be forty-four cents per ounce and a
proportionate tax at the like rate on all fractional parts of an ounce.
Such tax shall be computed based on the net weight as listed by the
manufacturer.
(c) The tax on an electronic nicotine delivery system containing
three milliliters or less of consumable material shall be five cents per
milliliter of consumable material and a proportionate tax at the like
rate on all fractional parts of a milliliter.
(c) (d) The tax on an electronic nicotine delivery system containing
more than three milliliters of consumable material shall be forty ten
percent of (i) the purchase price of such electronic nicotine delivery
system paid by the first owner or (ii) the price at which the first owner
who made, manufactured, or fabricated the electronic nicotine delivery
system sells the item to others.
(d) (e) For electronic nicotine delivery systems in the possession
of retail dealers for which tax has not been paid, the tax under this
subsection shall be imposed at the earliest time the retail dealer: (i)
Brings or causes to be brought into the state any electronic nicotine
delivery system for sale; (ii) makes, manufactures, or fabricates any
electronic nicotine delivery system in this state for sale in this state;
or (iii) sells any electronic nicotine delivery system to consumers
within this state.
(e) (f) The tax on tobacco products other than snuff and electronic
nicotine delivery systems shall be twenty percent of (i) the purchase
price of such tobacco products paid by the first owner or (ii) the price
at which a first owner who made, manufactured, or fabricated the tobacco
product sells the items to others.
-2-

LB712 LB712
2025 2025
(f) (g) The tax on tobacco products shall be in addition to all
other taxes.
(2) Whenever any person who is licensed under section 77-4009
purchases tobacco products from another person licensed under section
77-4009, the seller shall be liable for the payment of the tax.
(3) Amounts collected pursuant to this section shall be used and
distributed pursuant to section 77-4025.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-4008, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-